src/abbr-sma-lex.txt
!Distributed under the terms of the GNU General Public License version 2 
! or any later version.

! ============================= !
! File containing abbreviations !
! ============================= !


! Lexica for adding tags and periods
! ----------------------------------

! Splitting in 3 groups, because of the preprocessor
! - - - - - - - - - - - - - - - - - - - - - - - - - 

LEXICON Abbreviation
        ITRAB ;     
        TRNUMAB ;
        TRAB ;  

! Now splitting according to POS, and according to dot or not
! - - - - - - - - - - - - - - - - - - - - - - - - - - - - - -

! First collecting POS info, *-noun, *-adv, etc.
! Also splitting when in doubt: -noun-adj => -noun and -adj
! Then pointing to two contlexes, a dot-one and a non-dot-one.

LEXICON ab ! No POS, don't know what pos
 ab-nodot ;
 ab-dot ;

! Some of these POS
!LEXICON ab-noun-adj
! ab-noun ;
! ab-adj ;

LEXICON ab-dot-noun-adj
 ab-dot-noun ;
 ab-dot-adj ;

LEXICON ab-noun
 ab-nodot-noun ;
 ab-dot-noun ;

LEXICON ab-adj
 ab-nodot-adj ;
 ab-dot-adj ;

LEXICON ab-adv
 ab-nodot-adv ;
 ab-dot-adv ;

LEXICON ab-num
 ab-nodot-num ;
 ab-dot-num;

!still not in use.
!LEXICON ab-cc
!ab-nodot-cc ;
!ab-dot-cc ;


! Here come POS and Case tags, and no period.

LEXICON ab-nodot-noun ! The bulk 
 +ABBR+N+Attr:%> # ;  ! no period, that is. 
 +ABBR+N+Nom:%> # ;  ! no period, that is.
 +ABBR+N+Acc:%> # ;  ! no period, that is.
 +ABBR+N+Gen:%> # ;  ! no period, that is.
 +ABBR+N+Ill:%>%:j # ;  ! no period, that is.
 +ABBR+N+Ine:%>%:n # ;  ! no period, that is.
 +ABBR+N+Ela:%>%:s # ;  ! no period, that is.
 +ABBR+N+Com:%>%:jn # ; ! no period, that is.
 +ABBR+N+Ess:%>%:n # ;  ! no period, that is.
 +ABBR+N:%>%- RAbbr ;

LEXICON ab-nodot-adj
!+ABBR:%> # ;  ! no period, that is.
 +ABBR+A+Attr:%> # ;  ! no period, that is. 
 +ABBR+A+Nom:%> # ;  ! no period, that is.
 +ABBR+A+Acc:%> # ;  ! no period, that is.
 +ABBR+A+Gen:%> # ;  ! no period, that is.
 +ABBR+A+Ill:%>%:j # ;  ! no period, that is.
 +ABBR+A+Ine:%>%:n # ;  ! no period, that is.
 +ABBR+A+Ela:%>%:s # ;  ! no period, that is.
 +ABBR+A+Com:%>%:jn # ; ! no period, that is.
 +ABBR+A+Ess:%>%:n # ;  ! no period, that is.
 +ABBR+A:%>%- RAbbr ;

LEXICON ab-nodot-adv
! +ABBR:%> # ;  ! no period, that is.
  +ABBR+Adv:%> # ;      ! Adv without case, consider this.
! +ABBR+Adv+Attr:%> # ; ! no period, that is. 
! +ABBR+Adv+Nom:%> # ;  ! no period, that is.
! +ABBR+Adv+Acc:%> # ;  ! no period, that is.
! +ABBR+Adv+Gen:%> # ;  ! no period, that is.
! +ABBR+Adv:%>%- RAbbr ;
 
LEXICON ab-nodot-num
!+ABBR:%> # ;  ! no period, that is.
 +ABBR+Num+Nom:%> # ;  ! no period, that is.
 +ABBR+Num+Acc:%> # ;  ! no period, that is.
 +ABBR+Num+Gen:%> # ;  ! no period, that is.
 +ABBR+Num:%>%- RAbbr ;


! Still not in use.
!LEXICON ab-nodot-cc
! +ABBR+CC:%> # ;  ! no period, that is. 

LEXICON ab-nodot ! default
!+ABBR:%> # ;  ! no period, that is.
 +ABBR+Attr:%> # ;  ! no period, that is. 
 +ABBR+Nom:%> # ;  ! no period, that is.
 +ABBR+Acc:%> # ;  ! no period, that is.
 +ABBR+Gen:%> # ;  ! no period, that is.
 +ABBR:%>%- RAbbr ;


! Here come POS and Case tags, with the period added.

LEXICON ab-dot ! Default
! +ABBR:%.%> # ; 
 +ABBR+Attr:%.%> # ;  
 +ABBR+Nom:%.%> # ; 
 +ABBR+Acc:%.%> # ; 
 +ABBR+Gen:%.%> # ; 

LEXICON ab-dot-noun ! This is the lexicon for abbrs that must have a period.
! +ABBR:%.%> # ; 
 +ABBR+N+Attr:%.%> # ;  
 +ABBR+N+Nom:%.%> # ; 
 +ABBR+N+Acc:%.%> # ; 
 +ABBR+N+Gen:%.%> # ; 

LEXICON ab-dot-adj ! This is the lexicon for abbrs that must have a period.
! +ABBR:%.%> # ; 
 +ABBR+A+Attr:%.%> # ;  
 +ABBR+A+Nom:%.%> # ; 
 +ABBR+A+Acc:%.%> # ; 
 +ABBR+A+Gen:%.%> # ; 

LEXICON ab-dot-adv ! This is the lexicon for abbrs that must have a period.
  +ABBR+Adv:%.%> # ;        ! Adv without case.
! +ABBR+Adv+Attr:%.%> # ;  
! +ABBR+Adv+Nom:%.%> # ; 
! +ABBR+Adv+Acc:%.%> # ; 
! +ABBR+Adv+Gen:%.%> # ; 
 
LEXICON ab-dot-num ! This is the lexicon for abbrs that must have a period.
! +ABBR:%.%> # ; 
 +ABBR+Num+Nom:%.%> # ; 
 +ABBR+Num+Acc:%.%> # ; 
 +ABBR+Num+Gen:%.%> # ; 

LEXICON ab-dot-cc
 +ABBR+CC:%.%> # ;  

! Adding case suffixes to the abbrs in a tentative manner, to test it
! out. The problem with the original treatment represented by the first, 
! outcommented member of the two lexica) is that especially intransiv


! Then, as an afterthought, come our two verbs, gč. and vrd.

!LEXICON ab-verb ! A lexicon for "gč." and perhaps also other abbreviated verbs.
! ab-dot-verb ;
! ab-nodot-verb ;
! Not in use
LEXICON ab-dot-verb
 +ABBR+V+TV+Imprt:%.%>   # ; ! Period.

!LEXICON ab-nodot-verb 
! +ABBR+V+TV+Imprt:%>    # ; ! No period.
! Not in use.
 
 

  
! The abbreviation lexicon itself
! -------------------------------



! =============================================== !
!            Intransitive abbreviations           !
! =============================================== !

LEXICON TRNUMAB
! For abbrs for which numerals are complements, but other
! words not necessarily are. This group treats arabic numerals as
! if it were transitive but letters as if it were intransitive.
! TODO: Bug the fact that these abbrs do not distinguish between
! cap and small letters, whereast he ITRAB ones do.



Apd		ab-dot ;                                      !
bie		ab-dot ;
Bnr		ab-dot-noun ;                                 !
Gnr		ab-noun ;                                 !
Kommune#nr	ab-dot-noun ;
Pb		ab-noun ; ! Postbox 
!Poastanr	ab-dot-noun ;
Post#nr		ab-dot-noun ;
Rt		ab-dot ;                                      !
S.nr		ab-noun ;                                 !
Suohkan#nr	ab-dot-noun ;
O.nr		ab-noun ;                                 !
alm		ab-dot ;                                      !
b		ab ; ! b. is a transitive abbr as in geas. 12.! b. 2001.
bnr		ab-noun ;                                 !
!čk		ab-dot ;                                      !
fnr		ab-noun ;
gnr		ab-dot-noun ;                                 !
j		ab-dot ;                                      !
jnr		ab-dot ;                                      !
kap	ab-nodot-noun ;                           !
kap:kap		ab-dot-noun ;                                 !
kr		ab ;                                          !
!mátke#tlf	ab-dot-noun ;
nr		ab-noun ; ! Nr nicht                          !
rieg		ab-dot-verb ; !riegádan
s		ab-noun ;                                     !
tab:tab	ab ; ! or: Add capital Tab.               !
dii		ab-dot ;                                      !
tlf		ab-dot-noun ;                                 !
vnr		ab-dot-noun ;                                 !




! =============================================== !
!              Transitive abbreviations           !
! =============================================== !
                              

LEXICON ITRAB
2p		ab ;	!^C^                    !
3p		ab ;	!^C^                    !
abl		ab-noun ;
abstr		ab-adj ;
adj		ab-noun ;
can    ab-dot-noun ;
advl		ab-noun ;
affekt		ab ;
akk/gen		ab-noun ;	!^C^
akt		ab ;
anat		ab-dot-adj ; !anatomalaš    !
att		ab ;
attr		ab ;
bfr		ab-nodot ;                      !
biol		ab-dot-adj ;                !
bot		ab-dot-adj ;                    !
r		ab-dot-adj ;                    !
c		ab ;                            !
c/o		ab-nodot ;	!^C^        !
ca		ab-dot ;                        !
cal		ab ;                            !
cg		ab-nodot-noun ;                      !
cm		ab-nodot-noun ;                      !
vt		ab-nodot-noun ;
d		ab ;                            !
daa		ab-nodot ;                      !
dB		ab-nodot ;                      !
d.d		ab-dot ;                        !
ded		ab-dot-noun ;                   !
dem:dem	ab ;
dg		ab-nodot ;                      !
dl		ab-nodot-noun ;                      !
dm³		ab-nodot-noun ;
do		ab-dot ;                        !
dus		ab-dot ;                        !
e		ab ;                            !
ess	ab-noun ;
etc		ab-dot-adv ;                    !
f		ab ;                            !
f		ab-dot ;                        !
fac		ab ;                            !
ff		ab ;                            !
fin		ab ;
fr		ab ;                            !
geogr		ab-dot-adj ; !geografiijas  !
geom		ab-dot-adj ; !geometrihkala !š
ger		ab-dot ;
ha         ab-nodot ;
h		ab ;                            !
hg		ab-nodot-noun ;                 !
Hz		ab-nodot-noun ;
ib		ab-nodot ;                      !
ibid	ab-nodot ;                  !
ill		ab-noun ;
impers		ab-dot ;
impf		ab ;
imprt		ab-noun ;
ing		ab-dot-noun ;                        !
instr		ab ;
interr		ab-dot-adj ;
intr		ab-dot-adj ;
j.e	ab-dot ;                            !
je		ab-dot ;                        !
jna		ab-adv ; !ja nu ain             !
j.n.v ab-dot-adv ; !ja nav vijdábun !
jnv		ab-adv ;                        !
jur		ab-dot-adj ; !juridihkalaš      !
kHz		ab-nodot-noun ;                 !
km²		ab-nodot-noun ;
km2        ab-nodot-noun ;
kom:kom		ab ;
kond		ab ;
konkr		ab-dot-adj; !konkrehta
Kr		ab-noun ;                             !
kV		ab-nodot ;
kvm		ab-nodot ;
kl		ab-nodot ;
kW		ab-nodot-noun ;
Lohk		ab-dot ;
m		ab-noun ;
matem		ab-dot-adj ; !matematihkalaš
mg		ab-nodot-noun ;
milj	ab-num ;
miljo	ab-dot-num ;
mill	ab-nodot-num ; !But this is also used with dot
mm		ab-nodot-noun ;
mm³		ab-nodot-noun ;
mrd	ab-num ;
mV	ab-nodot ;
mW	ab-nodot ;
m³		ab-nodot-noun ;
nom:nom		ab-noun ;
o.Kr	ab-dot-adv ; !Does this exist?
od.prp	ab-dot ;
oKr	ab-dot-adv ;
part	ab-dot-noun ; !partihkkal
pf	ab-dot ;
pot		ab-noun ;
pres	ab ;
prf	ab-dot ;
pron	ab-dot-noun ;
prt		ab ;
pvc	ab-nodot ;
refl	ab-adj ;
relat	ab-dot-adj ; !relatiiva
ru		ab-dot ;
spd		ab-dot-noun ;
subj		ab-noun ;
tabl		ab-dot-noun ;
tan		ab-noun ;   !tangeansa
á		ab ;                            !
LEXICON TRAB                  
1.aman	ab-dot ;	!^C^      !1.amanuensis
Adr	ab-dot-noun ;             !Adreassa
adr		ab-dot-noun ;		   !adreassa
biht		  ab-dot ;                 !
bnr		ab-dot-noun ;
bs ab-dot-verb ;
Chr		ab-dot ;              !Christian
dbm	  ab-dot-noun ;           !
dm:dm			  ab-nodot-noun ;  !desimehtar
dr.theol		  ab-dot-noun ;    !
et        ab-nodot ;               !
alii        ab-nodot-noun ;
min    ab-nodot-noun ;
kat    ab-dot-noun ;
lc    ab-nodot-noun ;
lix    ab-nodot-noun ;
miner    ab-dot-noun ;
mp   ab-nodot-noun ;
pa    ab-dot-noun ;
pt    ab-dot-noun ;
pta    ab-nodot-noun ;
sfr    ab-nodot-noun ;
rbl    ab-nodot-noun ;
vulg    ab-dot-noun ;
dual    ab-nodot-noun ;
ea.ea			  ab ; ! 15 %- ea.ea without final dot.!
eren			  ab-dot-adj ;                            !
eŋg			  ab-dot-noun-adj;                        !
fenr			  ab-dot-noun ;                            !
fig			  ab-dot ;                                !
H.M		ab-dot ;              !Hans/hennes majestet
Innst		ab-dot ;          !Innstilling
Joh:Joh	ab-noun ;         !Johannes
kapt		  ab-dot-noun ;            !
ltn	  ab-dot-noun ;                         !
lul		  ab-dot ;                     !lullisámegiela, lulesamisk
milj		  ab-dot-num ;             !
mrs		  ab-dot ;                     !
obl		  ab-dot ;                     !
Od.prp		ab-dot-noun ;          !Odeldikkeproposišuvdna
Od		ab-nodot-noun ;        !Odelstinget
Ot.prop		ab-noun ;              !
Ot.prp		ab-noun ;              !
Oth.prop	ab-noun ;              !h?
ovdasu            ab-dot ;             !
pharm	  ab-dot-adj ;                 !
pol		  ab-dot ;                     !
polit		  ab-dot-adj ;             !
priv		  ab-dot-adj ;             !
pro		  ab ;                         !
psyk		  ab-dot-adj ;             !
res.kap  ab-dot-noun ;                      !
resipr	ab-dot-adj ; !resiprohka TRAB or ITRAB?
Rom:Rom	ab-noun ;         !Girje romalaččaide
Sd.dieđ.nr	ab-noun ;         !Stuorradikkedieđahus nummer
Sd.prp.nr	ab-noun ;         !
St.d.nr		ab-noun;          !
St.meld		ab-noun ;         !
St.nr		ab-noun ;         !
St.prp.nr	ab-noun ;         !Stortingsproposisjon nummer
su          ab-dot-adv ;               ! sullii
sásu			 ab-dot ;                      !
tlf		ab-dot-noun ;
vs		  ab-dot-cc ;                  !
F	ab-dot-noun ;
K	ab-noun ;
O	ab-noun ;
T	ab-dot-noun ;
Å	ab-dot-noun ;
